Massachusetts, session 194th, S1448.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 10 of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the third paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:–
If the rights authorized by a variance are not exercised within one year of the date of
grant of such variance, which shall not include such time required to pursue or await the
determination of an appeal referred to in section seventeen, such rights shall lapse; provided,
however, that the permit granting authority in its discretion and upon written application by the
grantee of such rights may extend the time for exercise of such rights for a period not to exceed
six months; and provided, further, that the application for such extension is filed with such
permit granting authority prior to the expiration of such one-year period. If the permit granting
authority does not grant such extension within thirty days of the date of application therefor, and
upon the expiration of the original one-year period, such rights may be reestablished only after
notice and a new hearing pursuant to the provisions of this section.
of 1